resultats/hunspell/catalan.dic
abstractiu/_B_V_Y
acornat/_B_V_Y
actinó/_G_V_Y
adoptat/_B_V_Y
aerotèrmic/_F_V_Y
aeròbic/_E_V_Y
aflux/_I_V_Y
afrancesat/_B_V_Y
afusió/_G_V_Y
afàs/_i_V_Y
aiguavés/_i_V_Y
ajogassat/_B_V_Y
aleatorització/_G_V_Y
alerç/_I_V_Y
alficòs/_i_V_Y
almoiner/_F_V_Y
alternador/_E_V_Y
amarronat/_B_V_Y
ambició/_G_V_Y
androcèntric/_F_V_Y
anoplur/_E_V_Y
anticancerós/_I_V_Y
anticipació/_G_V_Y
anticonvulsiu/_B_V_Y
anticòs/_i_V_Y
anul·lador/_F_V_Y
anvers/_I_V_Y
aplacentat/_B_V_Y
ardiaca/_E_V_Y
arenació/_G_V_Y
argumentatiu/_B_V_Y
arrambadís/_i_V_Y
arxienemic/_B_V_Y
as/_I_V_Y
asfèric/_F_V_Y
attrezzo/_E_V_Y
aualé/_G_V_Y
autodirigit/_B_V_Y
autoinducció/_G_V_Y
autorevers/_I_V_Y
aïnenc/_F_V_Y
baix/_I
balanoglòs/_i
barcòmetre/_E
barnús/_i
barrobí/_G
beix/_I
bellugadís/_i
beneït/_B
benzidínic/_F
biogàs/_I
biozona/_E
blavís/_B
borelià/_G
borràs/_i
boç/_I
brafimenc/_F
bromometria/_E
cadars/_I
cafís/_i
calís/_i
camallonga/_E
campellenc/_F
campetx/_I
canaró/_G
canyís/_i
capacitat/_B
carcabòs/_i
cardús/_I
carràs/_i
carura/_E
catinenc/_F
cementació/_G
ciberamic/_B
cilindreix/_I
cinetropisme/_E
codís/_i
coeducador/_F
cogeneració/_G
colúmbid/_E
complex/_I
componat/_B
confés/_i
congestió/_G
contrapès/_I
contrastiu/_B
convergència/_E
copte/_F
correcció/_G
crostís/_i
crètic/_E
cuguç/_I
culivat/_B
còrnic/_F
declinació/_G
decés/_i
dervix/_I
desacordança/_E
desacostumat/_B
descartelització/_G
desembós/_i
desfutrellat/_B
desguaix/_I
desinterès/_i
desnivellació/_G
desoladíssim/_F
destrellatat/_B
dihidrita/_E
dilecció/_G
dispèptic/_F
dolorit/_B
dors/_I
ecètica/_E_V_Y
eixugó/_G_V_Y
electronogràfic/_F_V_Y
embós/_i_V_Y
empestat/_B_V_Y
encalç/_I_V_Y
endosoma/_E_V_Y
enlletrat/_B_V_Y
ennuvoladíssim/_F_V_Y
entrecàs/_I_V_Y
entrepàs/_i_V_Y
esbaldregat/_E_V_Y
escabellat/_B_V_Y
escalí/_G_V_Y
escamós/_I_V_Y
escarràs/_i_V_Y
esculent/_F_V_Y
esmerç/_I_V_Y
espeït/_B_V_Y
espigueta/_E_V_Y
esquerdís/_i_V_Y
estocfix/_I_V_Y
estràbic/_F_V_Y
estuació/_G_V_Y
euromoneda/_E_V_Y
exdirectiu/_B_V_Y
extradós/_i_V_Y
extraversió/_G_V_Y
faldiller/_F
feix/_I
fenícia/_E
ferrús/_i
feréstec/_B
flamenc/_F
flanquís/_I
fleumó/_G
formosor/_E
fugaç/_F
furiós/_I
gaiat/_B
gambosí/_G
garaüller/_E
garbís/_i
garrés/_I
gimnospèrmic/_F
goix/_I
golàs/_i
gotim/_E
granitització/_G
gronxadís/_B
guardabraç/_I
guardanàs/_i
haplostèmon/_F_V_Y
heptavalent/_E_V_Y
hipotensió/_G_Y
hispanovisigòtic/_F_V_Y
hídria/_E_V_Y
impeditiu/_B_V_Y
inacabadíssim/_F_V_Y
inconnexió/_G_Y
indeliberat/_B_V_Y
inferible/_E_V_Y
infix/_I_V_Y
ingrés/_i_V_Y
inofensiu/_B_V_Y
intel·lecció/_G_Y
invitat/_B_V_Y
involut/_F_V_Y
isoanticòs/_i_V_Y
italiota/_E_V_Y
justificació/_G
lignític/_F
lipòlisi/_E
llambroix/_I
llenegadís/_B
lloació/_G
lluç/_I
macilent/_F
macrojudici/_E
malintencionat/_B
malvapeix/_I
marranís/_i
marsdenià/_G
marès/_I
matalàs/_i
matinador/_F
matriarcat/_E
metrobús/_I
micòcit/_E
midoner/_F
mineralització/_G
mirallat/_B
molós/_i
mordacíssim/_F
motejaire/_E
multiprocés/_i
multivers/_I
nació/_G
neurofisiològic/_F
neuroplasticitat/_E
nevat/_B
nodrís/_i
nus/_I
oculoreacció/_G_V_Y
oligàrquic/_F_V_Y
olècran/_E_V_Y
ordenat/_B_V_Y
paleògnat/_E
paleògraf/_F
palmàs/_i
panteix/_I
paral·lelització/_G
parnàs/_i
pastís/_i
pecúnia/_E
pedaç/_I
pedunculat/_B
pendís/_i
pentandre/_F
perspiració/_G
pes/_I
pinochetista/_E
placidíssim/_F
pluriestratificat/_B
politicoterritorial/_E
pollancó/_G
pollís/_i
portadorer/_F
preavís/_I
prescriptiu/_B
prestació/_G
procés/_i
profiterola/_E
prosoviètic/_F
pustulació/_G
quadrat/_B
quart/_E
quimiotròpic/_F
radioenllaç/_I
reciclació/_G
recolp/_E
recés/_i
redistributiu/_B
refús/_I
relativització/_G
remeier/_F
repàs/_i
restauratiu/_B
retrospecció/_G
reuma/_E
romanç/_I
russafenc/_F
salabre/_E
sanedrí/_G
sargàs/_i
sellardo/_F
semicurat/_B
serranet/_E
simplificació/_G
sobrancer/_F
sobreentès/_I
solteràs/_i
solutiu/_B
sordceguesa/_E
subjectivació/_G
surellenc/_F
talc/_E
talòs/_i
tarragoní/_G
teix/_I
tenellut/_B
termopropulsor/_F
terrandòs/_i
toluè/_G
transitable/_E
través/_i
traçador/_F
trencaglaç/_I
triradiat/_B
trivialització/_G
univalve/_F_V_Y
verjurat/_B
verticalització/_G
vespral/_E
vilíssim/_F
xassís/_i
xereix/_I
àvid/_F_V_Y
